South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S712.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 3, Chapter 7, Title 1 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 1-7-550. For two years after leaving office, a solicitor may not represent a client for a fee or appear in court in the district from which he was elected. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----